Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5892YC (6) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.34, subsection 12, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. An applicant for special registration 3 plates with a distinguishing processed emblem issued pursuant 4 to subsection 8A, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 20A, 20B, 20C, 24, 5 or 27 may request the plates be navy along the top and red 6 along the bottom, containing a white space in the middle of 7 the plate displaying the plateâs letters and numbers in black, 8 with a gray image of a bald eagle behind the plateâs letters 9 and numbers, at no additional cost. A person may exchange 10 previously issued special registration plates consistent 11 with the design and color of regular registration plates and 12 containing such a distinguishing processed emblem for the 13 applicable special registration plates for which the person is 14 eligible with a plate design described in this paragraph at no 15 additional cost. 16 Sec. 2. Section 321.166, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 9. Special registration plates issued pursuant to section 19 321.34 , other than gold star must be consistent with the 20 design and color of regular registration plates and comply 21 with the requirements for regular registration plates to the 22 extent the requirements are consistent with the subsection 23 authorizing a particular special vehicle registration plate, 24 and may provide a space on a portion of the plate for the 25 purpose of allowing a distinguishing processed emblem or the 26 placement of an organization decal. However , medal of honor, 27 collegiate, fire fighter, natural resources, blackout, and 28 flying our colors registration plates, shall be consistent with 29 the design and color of regular registration plates but shall 30 provide a space on a portion of the plate for the purpose of 31 allowing the placement of a distinguishing processed emblem or 32 an organization decal and special registration plates issued 33 in accordance with section 321.34, subsection 12, paragraph 34 â0bâ , must be consistent with the design described for the 35 -1- LSB 5892YC (6) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ plates, as applicable . Special registration plates shall also 1 comply with the requirements for regular registration plates 2 as provided in this section to the extent the requirements are 3 consistent with the section authorizing a particular special 4 vehicle registration plate. 5